Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2159.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 17, chapter 3, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 17-321, to read: START_STATUTE17-321. Private lands; taking of Mexican wolves; landowner permits; rules A. The department shall issue to a landowner a landowner permit for the taking of mexican wolves on the following: 1. the landowner's private land. 2. public lands as defined in section 37-901 and state trust lands that are leased to the landowner for grazing purposes. the department may issue the permit only to a lessee that owns private land in this state. b. The department may adopt rules to establish a voluntary and compensated incentive program for the humane and non-lethal trapping of mexican wolves that would otherwise be taken pursuant to this section. C. The department shall issue a landowner permit if the COMMISSION DETERMINES that the permit is necessary to reduce CONFLICTS between mexican wolves and humans and between mexican wolves and property and to provide sport HUNTING OPPORTUNITIES CONSISTENT with rules adopted by the department. END_STATUTE